Hawaii statutes.
§171-86 Purpose. It is the purpose of
this part, in the public interest, to provide for immediate relocation and
rehabilitation of disaster victims by making public lands available in the
manner hereinafter provided, when a natural disaster strikes the State and
devastates large tracts of lands and causes the necessity for immediate
relocation of persons from the devastated areas. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp,
§103A-81; HRS §171-86]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next